pt-BR: Estilo da barra: Assimétrica; Lenço; High-low; Sereia; Com babados; Ondulada; Com fenda; Reta; Tulipa; Outros
tr: Etek boyu stili: Asimetrik; Mendil; Önü kısa arkası uzun; Balık; Fırfırlı; Dilimli; Yırtmaçlı; Düz; Lale; Diğer
ro-RO: Stilul tivului: Asimetric; Tip batistă; High-low; Sirenă; Cu volane; Festonat; Cu crăpătură; Drept; Lalea; Altele
fi: Helman tyyli: Epäsymmetrinen; Nenäliinahelma; Edestä lyhyt, takaa pitkä; Merenneito; Röyhelöinen; Simpukkareunainen; Halkiollinen; Suora; Tulppaani; Muu
pt-PT: Estilo da bainha: Assimétrica; Lenço; High-low; Sereia; Com folhos; Ondulada; Com rachas; Direita; Tulipa; Outro
ja: 裾のスタイル: アシンメトリー; ハンカチーフ; ハイロー; マーメイド; ラッフル; スカラップ; スリット; ストレート; チューリップ; その他
lt-LT: Apačios linijos stilius: Asimetriškas; Skepetos tipo; Asimetriško ilgio („High-low“); Undinėlės formos; Su raukiniais; Banguotas; Su skeltuku; Tiesus; Tulpės formos; Kita
bg-BG: Стил на подгъва: Асиметричен; Тип кърпа; Асиметричен дълъг гръб; Русалка; С къдрички; На вълни; С цепка; Прав; Лале; Други
el: Στυλ στριφώματος: Ασύμμετρο; Μαντίλι; High-low; Γοργόνα; Με βολάν; Κυματιστό; Με σκίσιμο; Ίσιο; Τουλίπα; Άλλο
hr-HR: Stil ruba: Asimetrični; Kao maramica; Visoko-niski; Sirena; S volanima; Valoviti; S prorezom; Ravni; Tulipan; Ostalo
vi: Kiểu viền gấu: Bất đối xứng; Kiểu khăn tay; High-low; Đuôi cá; Bèo nhún; Vỏ sò; Xẻ tà; Dáng suông; Hoa tulip; Khác
sk-SK: Dĺžka sukne: Asymetrický; Cípový; Vpredu krátky, vzadu dlhý; Morská víla; Volánový; Vlnovkový; S rázporkom; Rovný; Tulipánový; Iné
sl-SI: Stil linije spodnjega roba: Asimetričen; Robčkast; Visoko-nizko; Morska deklica; Z volančki; Nazobčan; Razporek; Raven; Tulipan; Drugo
hu: Alsó szegély stílusa: Aszimmetrikus; Zsebkendőfazon; Elöl rövid, hátul hosszú; Sellőfazon; Fodros; Cakkos; Hasítékos; Egyenes; Tulipánfazon; Egyéb
es: Estilo de dobladillo: Asimétrico; Pañuelo; Desigual (alto-bajo); Sirena; Con volantes; Festoneado; Con abertura; Recto; Tulipán; Otro
ko: 밑단 스타일: 비대칭; 손수건형; 하이로우; 머메이드; 러플; 스캘럽; 슬릿; 스트레이트; 튤립; 기타
de: Stil des Saums: Asymmetrisch; Zipfelsaum; High-Low; Meerjungfrau; Gerüscht; Bogenkante; Geschlitzt; Gerade; Tulpe; Andere
nb: Faldestil: Asymmetrisk; Lommetørkle; Høy-lav; Havfrue; Rysjer; Bølgekant; Splitt; Rett; Tulipan; Annet
zh-TW: 下襬樣式: 不對稱; 手帕式下擺; 前短後長; 魚尾式; 荷葉邊; 扇形波浪; 開衩; 直筒式; 鬱金香式; 其他
sv: Fållmodell: Asymmetrisk; Näsduksfåll; High-low; Sjöjungfru; Volangförsedd; Uddig; Slitsad; Rak; Tulpan; Annat
it: Stile dell'orlo: Asimmetrico; A fazzoletto; High-low; A sirena; Con volant; Smerlato; Con spacco; Dritto; A tulipano; Altro
zh-CN: 下摆样式: 不对称; 手帕式下摆; 前短后长; 鱼尾形下摆; 荷叶边; 扇形下摆; 开衩; 平直下摆; 郁金香式下摆; 其他
fr: Style d’ourlet: Asymétrique; En pointe; Plongeant; Sirène; À volants; Festonné; Fendu; Droit; Tulipe; Autre
ru: Тип линии низа: Асимметричный; Платочный; Разноуровневый; Русалка; С оборками; Фестончатый; С разрезом; Прямой; Тюльпан; Другое
cs: Styl lemování: Asymetrický; Cípový (handkerchief); High-low; Mořská panna; S volány; Vroubkovaný; S rozparkem; Rovný; Tulipánový; Jiný
pl: Styl linii dołu: Asymetryczny; Chustkowy; Dłuższy tył; Syrenka; Z falbanką; Falisty; Z rozcięciem; Prosty; Tulipan; Inny
th: สไตล์ชายกระโปรง: อสมมาตร; ทรงผ้าเช็ดหน้า; หน้าสั้นหลังยาว; หางปลา; ระบาย; ขอบโค้งลายหอย; ผ่าข้าง; ตรง; ทรงดอกทิวลิป; อื่นๆ
en: Hemline style: Asymmetric; Handkerchief; High-low; Mermaid; Ruffled; Scalloped; Slit; Straight; Tulip; Other
nl: Zoom stijl: Asymmetrisch; Zakdoek; High-low; Zeemeermin; Met ruches; Geschulpt; Met split; Recht; Tulp; Overig
da: Type af kantafslutning: Asymmetrisk; Lommetørklæde; Høj-lav; Havfrue; Med flæser; Bølget; Slids; Lige; Tulipan; Andet